Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-120.03
Generic drugs; use.

Any person or entity that dispenses medicines and medical supplies, as required by section 48-120, shall dispense the generic drug equivalent unless:

(1) A generic drug equivalent is unavailable; or

(2) The prescribing physician specifically provides in writing that a nongeneric drug must be dispensed.

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 28.